Missouri, session 2026, HB1979.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 190.098, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 190.098, to read as follows:
190.098. 1. As used in this section, the term "community paramedic services"
means services that are:
(1) Provided by any entity that:
(a) Employs licensed paramedics who are certified as community paramedics by
the department; and
(b) Has received an endorsement by the department as a community paramedic
service entity;
(2) Provided in a nonemergent setting, independent of a 911 system or
emergency summons;
(3) Consistent with the training and education, as well as within the scope of skill
and practice, of the personnel and with the supervisory standard approved by the
medical director; and
(4) Reflected and documented in the entity's patient care plans or protocols
approved by the medical director in accordance with section 190.142.
2. In order for a person to be eligible for certification by the department as a
community paramedic, an individual shall:
(1) Be currently [certified] licensed as a paramedic;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1979 2
(2) Successfully complete or have successfully completed a community paramedic
certification program from a college, university, or educational institution that has been
approved by the department or accredited by a national accreditation organization approved
by the department; and
(3) Complete an application form approved by the department.
[2.] 3. A community paramedic shall practice in accordance with protocols and
supervisory standards established by the medical director in collaboration with the
ambulance service administrator. [A community paramedic shall provide services of a
health care plan if the plan has been developed by the patient's physician or by an advanced
practice registered nurse through a collaborative practice arrangement with a physician or a
physician assistant through a collaborative practice arrangement with a physician and there is
no duplication of services to the patient from another provider] Patient care plans that are
developed by the patient's physician, advanced practice registered nurse, or physician
assistant shall be implemented through a collaboration with the medical director and
emergency medical response agency.
[3. Any ambulance service shall enter into a written contract to provide community
paramedic services in another ambulance service area, as that term is defined in section
190.100. The contract that is agreed upon may be for an indefinite period of time, as long as
it includes at least a sixty-day cancellation notice by either ambulance service] 4. (1) (a)
Any ambulance service that seeks to provide community paramedic services outside of
its ambulance service area, as described in section 190.105 and administered by the
department, and in the service area of another ambulance service that currently
provides community paramedic services shall be required to have a memorandum of
understanding with that ambulance service regarding the provision of such community
paramedic services. An ambulance service that provides community paramedic services
may provide community paramedic services without a memorandum of understanding
in the ambulance service area of an ambulance service that is not providing community
paramedic services, but the ambulance service providing community paramedic
services shall provide notification to the ambulance service with emergency service
responsibilities in the service area of the general community paramedic activities being
performed.
(b) An ambulance service that provides sustained community paramedic
services in an area outside the county of the ambulance service's primary 911 response
territory and where another ambulance service also offers community paramedic
services shall coordinate its community paramedic services with the local ambulance
service offering community paramedic services in that area.

HB 1979 3
(c) Nothing in this subdivision shall prevent an ambulance service that provides
community paramedic services from honoring any formal contract or agreement with a
health care institution, hospital licensed under chapter 197, health clinic, or insurance
company for the provision of community paramedic services.
(2) Any emergency medical response agency seeking to provide community
paramedic services within its designated response service area may do so if the ground
ambulance service covering the area within which the emergency medical response
agency is located does not provide community paramedic services. If such ground
ambulance service does provide community paramedic services, the ground ambulance
service may establish, at its sole discretion, a memorandum of understanding with the
emergency medical response agency planning to offer community paramedic services in
order to coordinate programs and avoid service duplication. If an emergency medical
response agency is providing community paramedic services in a service area before the
ground ambulance service in that service area begins offering community paramedic
services, the emergency medical response agency and the ground ambulance service
shall establish a memorandum of understanding for the coordination of services.
(3) A community paramedic program shall notify the appropriate local
ambulance service when providing services within the service area of an ambulance
service.
(4) The department shall establish regulations for the purpose of recognizing
community paramedic service entities that have met the standards necessary to provide
community paramedic services, including physician medical oversight, training, patient
recordkeeping, formal relationships with primary care services where necessary, and
quality improvement policies. The department shall issue an endorsement to any
community paramedic service entity that meets such standards that allows the entity to
provide community paramedic services for a period of five years.
[4.] 5. A community paramedic is subject to the provisions of sections 190.001 to
190.245 and rules promulgated under sections 190.001 to 190.245.
[5.] 6. No person shall hold himself or herself out as a community paramedic or
provide the services of a community paramedic unless such person is certified by the
department.
[6.] 7. The medical director shall approve the implementation of the community
paramedic program.
[7.] 8. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is
created under the authority delegated in this section shall become effective only if it complies
with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028.
This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the

HB 1979 4
general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to
disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of
rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2013, shall be invalid
and void.
✔